New York, session 2025-2026, A767.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 89-gg to read as follows: 3 § 89-gg. Youth justice innovation fund. 1. A fund to be known as the 4 "youth justice innovation fund" is hereby established in the custody of 5 the state comptroller and the commissioner of taxation and finance. 6 2. The fund shall consist of fifty million dollars transferred to such 7 account pursuant to a plan developed by the director of the budget from 8 funds made available for the purposes of funding services for youth 9 through the age of twenty-five, and any interest earnings which may 10 accrue from the investment of monies in the fund. Nothing contained 11 herein shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or bequests 12 for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and depositing 13 them into the fund according to law. 14 3. Monies of the fund shall be available to the division of criminal 15 justice services and shall be provided to community-based organizations 16 to be expended for services and programs with the purpose of youth 17 development and preventing youth arrest and incarceration, including, 18 but not limited to, those providing violence-prevention services for 19 youth, alternatives to detention, placement and incarceration programs 20 for youth, and reentry, education, and employment training and placement 21 programs for youth through the age of twenty-five. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01830-01-5 A. 767 2 1 4. On or before the first day of March of each year, the director of 2 the division of criminal justice services shall provide a written report 3 to the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, 4 the minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the assembly, 5 the chair of the senate finance committee, the chair of the assembly 6 ways and means committee, the chair of the senate committee on codes, 7 the chair of the assembly committee on codes, the state comptroller, and 8 the public. Such report shall include how the monies of the fund were 9 utilized during the preceding calendar year, and shall include: 10 (a) the amount of money disbursed from the fund and the award process 11 used for such disbursements; 12 (b) recipients of awards from the fund; 13 (c) the amount awarded to each recipient; 14 (d) the purposes for which such awards were granted; and 15 (e) a summary financial plan for such monies which shall include esti- 16 mates of all receipts and all disbursements for the current and succeed- 17 ing fiscal years, along with the actual results from the prior fiscal 18 year. 19 5. Monies shall be payable from the fund on the audit and warrant of 20 the comptroller on vouchers approved and certified by the director of 21 the division of criminal justice services. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to expend- 23 itures made on and after April 1, 2025.